Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-406
Licenses, permits, and stamps; issuance; fees; violation; penalty.

(1) Licenses, permits, and stamps required under the Game Law shall be issued by the commission and may be procured from the secretary of the commission. The commission may provide for the electronic issuance of any license, permit, or stamp required under the Game Law and may enter into contracts to procure necessary services and supplies for the electronic issuance of licenses, permits, and stamps. Except for permits issued under sections 37-462 and 37-463, the commission may provide for the issuance of any license, permit, or stamp required under the Game Law in the form of a number which identifies the holder in the records of the commission. The commission may designate itself and other persons, firms, and corporations as agents to issue licenses, permits, and stamps and collect the prescribed fees. The commission and any person, firm, or corporation authorized by the commission to issue licenses, permits, and stamps shall be entitled to collect and retain an additional fee of not more than four dollars, for each license, permit, or stamp issued as reimbursement for the clerical work of issuing the license, permit, or stamp and collecting and remitting the fees.

(2) The commission shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations regarding electronic issuance of licenses, permits, and stamps, including electronic issuance devices, deposits by agents, and remittance of fees. The commission may provide for the electronic issuance of a license, permit, or stamp by acknowledging the purchase of such license, permit, or stamp without requiring a physical license, permit, or stamp or facsimile of such.

(3) It shall be unlawful for any person to duplicate any electronically issued license, permit, or stamp. Any person violating this subsection shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor and shall be fined at least seventy-five dollars, and any license, permit, or stamp involved in such violation shall be confiscated by the court.

Laws 1929, c. 112, II, § 3, p. 409;

C.S.1929, § 37-203;

R.S.1943, § 37-203;

Laws 1963, c. 202, § 1, p. 652;

Laws 1983, LB 162, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 235, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-203;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 116;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 19;

Laws 2002, LB 1003, § 18;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB299, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB745, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 7.
July 18, 2026